Hawaii statutes.
§443B-9 Collection, attorney's, or
commission fees; exception. (a) A collection agency shall not collect, or
attempt to collect, any collection fee or attorney's fee or commission from any
debtor; provided that an attorney's fee or commission may be collected after
filing of a suit against any debtor and the fee or commission shall not be in
excess of twenty-five per cent of the unpaid principal balance. All attorney's
fees or commissions collected by a collection agency shall be remitted to the
attorney and no portion of the collection shall be retained by the collection
agency.

(b) This section shall not prohibit a
collection agency from collecting, or attempting to collect, from a debtor, a
commission authorized under a contract with the University of Hawaii, or a
contract with the department of taxation pursuant to sections 231-13 and
231-26. [L 1987, c 191, pt of §1; am L 1996, c 280, §2; am L 1999, c 68, §3; am
L 2002, c 213, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next